Nebraska, session 109, LB1036.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1036 LB1036
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 27-404, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
27-404 (1) Evidence of a person's character or a trait of his or her
character is not admissible for the purpose of proving that he or she
acted in conformity therewith on a particular occasion, except:
(a) Evidence of a pertinent trait of his or her character offered by
an accused, or by the prosecution to rebut the same;
(b) Evidence of a pertinent trait of character of the victim of the
crime offered by an accused or by the prosecution to rebut the same, or
evidence of a character trait of peacefulness of the victim offered by
the prosecution in a homicide case to rebut evidence that the victim was
the first aggressor. In a sexual assault case, reputation, opinion, or
other evidence of past sexual behavior of the victim is governed by
section 27-412; or
(c) Evidence of the character of a witness as provided in sections
27-607 to 27-609.
(2) Evidence of other crimes, wrongs, or acts is not admissible to
prove the character of a person in order to show that he or she acted in
conformity therewith. It may, however, be admissible:
(a) When it is inextricably intertwined with the charged crime; or
(b) For for other purposes, such as proof of motive, opportunity,
intent, preparation, plan, knowledge, identity, or absence of mistake or
accident.
(3) Evidence of other crimes, wrongs, or acts is inextricably
intertwined with the charged crime when such evidence:
(a) Forms part of the factual setting of the charged crime;
(b) Is so blended or connected to the charged crime that proof of
the charged crime will necessarily require proof of the other crimes,
wrongs, or bad acts; or
(c) Is necessary for the prosecution to present a coherent picture
of the charged crime.
-2-

LB1036 LB1036
2026 2026
(4)(a) In (3) When such evidence is admissible pursuant to this
section, in criminal cases, evidence of other crimes, wrongs, or acts of
the accused may be offered in evidence by the prosecution if the
prosecution proves to the court by clear and convincing evidence that:
(i) The the accused committed the crime, wrong, or act; and .
(ii) If the evidence is offered under subdivision (2)(a) of this
section, that such evidence is inextricably intertwined with the charged
crime.
(b) Such proof shall first be made outside the presence of any jury.
(c) Upon request by the accused, the court shall instruct the jury
to consider such evidence only for the limited purpose for which it was
admitted.
(4) Regarding the admissibility in a civil or criminal action of
evidence of a person's commission of another offense or offenses of
sexual assault under sections 28-316.01 and 28-319 to 28-322.05, see
sections 27-413 to 27-415.
Sec. 2. Original section 27-404, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-3-